Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-765
Revisor of Statutes; reissuance of volumes; duties.

The Revisor of Statutes, when reissuing and bringing up to date the Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, shall incorporate in the reissued volumes all laws enacted by the Legislature since the volumes to be reissued were brought up to date. He or she shall make such corrections of clerical and typographical errors as may have been discovered since the last publications thereof. He or she shall also include therein annotations to all decisions of the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, and the federal courts construing the sections therein that have been rendered since the last publication thereof. The reissued volumes shall be made up, printed, and bound to correspond, as nearly as practicable, with the present reissued volumes of the Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.

Laws 1973, LB 1, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 8, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1244, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 589, § 10.